Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
Medical Records

422.300.
Use of photostatic copies of medical records — Originals held available.

As used in KRS

422.300

to

422.330

, “state” has the same meaning as in KRS

421.360

.

Medical charts or records of any hospital licensed under either KRS

216B.105

or a similar law of another state or the United States that are susceptible to photostatic reproduction may be proved as to foundation, identity and authenticity without any preliminary testimony, by use of legible and durable copies, certified in the manner provided herein by the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the originals thereof. Said copies may be used in any trial, hearing, deposition or any other judicial or administrative action or proceeding, whether civil or criminal, in lieu of the original charts or records which, however, the hospital shall hold available during the pendency of the action or proceeding for inspection and comparison by the court, tribunal or hearing officer and by the parties and their attorneys of record.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 291, effective July 15, 1980; 2011, ch. 41, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

.

422.305.
Subpoena of records — Certification of copies — Personal delivery.

When a subpoena duces tecum is served upon any employee of any hospital, requiring the production of any such medical charts or records at any action or proceeding, it is sufficient if the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the original thereof promptly notifies, in writing, the attorney for the party causing service of the subpoena, of the hospital’s election to proceed under the provisions of KRS

422.300

to

422.330

and of the estimated actual and reasonable expenses of reproducing such charts or records. Upon such notification, the attorney causing the service of the subpoena shall notify all other attorneys of record or other parties if they are not represented by attorneys of the hospital’s election. Following such election, the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the original charts or records specified in the subpoena shall hold the originals available at the hospital, and upon payment to the hospital of the estimated reproduction expenses by the party causing service of the subpoena, or by any other party, shall promptly deliver, by certified mail or by personal delivery, legible and durable copies, certified by said hospital employee, of all medical charts or records specified in such subpoena to the person specified in the subpoena.

The certification shall be signed before a notary public by the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the records and shall include the full name of the patient, the patient’s medical record number, the number of pages in the medical record, and a legend substantially to the following effect: “The copies of records for which this certification is made are true and complete reproductions of the original or microfilmed medical records which are housed in (name of hospital). The original records were made in the regular course of business, and it was the regular course of (name of hospital) to make such records at or near the time of the matter recorded. This certification is given pursuant to KRS . . . . . by the custodian of the records in lieu of his or her personal appearance.” Such copies shall be separately enclosed and sealed in an inner envelope or wrapper bearing the legend “Copies of Medical Records,” and the title and number of the action or proceeding, the date of the subpoena, the name of the hospital, the full name of the patient, the patient’s medical record number and the name and business telephone number of the employee making the certification, and the sealed envelope or wrapper, together with the certification, shall then be enclosed and sealed in an outer envelope or wrapper, and delivered to the requesting party.

When the copies of records are personally delivered, a receipt shall be presented to the person receiving the records for his signature and shall be immediately signed and returned to the person delivering the records. The receipt shall contain the name of the hospital, the full name of the patient, the medical record number of the patient, the date the copies of records were received, and the signature of the person receiving the records. When the copies of records are sent via certified mail, the receipt used by the postal authorities shall be sufficient to prove delivery and receipt of the copies of records.

If the hospital has none of the charts or records specified in the subpoena, or only part thereof, the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of original hospital charts or records shall so state in a notarized affidavit and, following notice and payment of expenses shall hold available the original charts or records which are in the hospital’s custody and specified in the subpoena and shall deliver certified the copies together with the affidavit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

422.310.
Personal attendance of custodian of hospital records, when.

The personal attendance of the employee of the hospital charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the original charts or records specified in the subpoena shall be required if the records pertain to a patient treated by a psychiatrist and the hospital has not received within the thirty (30) days preceding service of the subpoena an authorization signed by the patient or his legal guardian permitting the contents of the records to be released. If personal attendance of a witness is required for the reason provided in this section, the hospital may nevertheless elect to substitute true, legible and durable copies of the charts or records specified in the subpoena duces tecum by the giving of a written notice of such election, in which case payment to the hospital of the actual and reasonable expenses of duplication of such charts or records by any party to the proceeding in which the subpoena was issued, or such party’s attorney of record, shall be a condition precedent to the personal attendance of any person pursuant to the subpoena, unless otherwise ordered by the court or other body before which said action or proceeding is pending.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

422.315.
Patient may ask to prohibit or limit use of his medical records.

Any patient whose medical records or charts are copied and delivered pursuant to KRS

422.300

to

422.330

, any person acting on his behalf, the hospital having custody of such records, or any physician, nurse or other person responsible for entries on such charts or records shall have standing to apply to the court or other body before which the action or proceeding is pending for a protective order denying, restricting or otherwise limiting access and use of such copies or original charts and records. Such patients, persons, hospitals, physicians or nurses who are not parties to the action or proceeding and who wish to apply for a protective order may petition to intervene in the action or proceeding and simultaneously apply for such a protective order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Potts, Providing Medical Records Under KRS

422.300

et seq., Vol. 42, No. 4, October, 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 24.

422.317.
Copy of patient’s medical record to be supplied on patient’s written request — Exception for Department of Corrections.

Upon a patient’s written request, a hospital licensed under KRS Chapter 216B or a health care provider shall provide, without charge to the patient, a copy of the patient’s medical record. A copying fee, not to exceed one dollar ($1) per page, may be charged by the health care provider for furnishing a second copy of the patient’s medical record upon request either by the patient or the patient’s attorney or the patient’s authorized representative.

The Department of Corrections shall not be considered as a health care provider under this section; however, the department may make medical records of an individual inmate available to that individual inmate unless the department, through its designee, determines that the provision of the record is subject to the provisions of KRS

197.025

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, Part 16, § 117, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 334, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

422.320.
Return of medical records to court clerk.

When the copies of records are delivered to a party or his attorney of record for use in a deposition, they shall, after termination of the deposition, be delivered personally or by certified mail to the clerk of the court or other body before which the action or proceeding is pending, and it shall be the responsibility of such party or attorney to transmit the receipt obtained to the employee of the hospital charged with responsibility of being custodian of the original records. When the records are received by the clerk of a court or other body from the hospital or from a party or his attorney of record they shall be retained in the clerk’s custody at all times except when actually used in the action or proceeding. Upon issuance of a final order terminating a case, the copies of the records will be promptly filed by the clerk of the court with all other documents pertaining to the case until such a time as the normal retention period for court records expires. The copies of records shall then be permanently disposed of by the clerk in a manner that protects the confidentiality of the medical information contained therein. Should the case be appealed, the copies of records shall be forwarded to the Court of Appeals with other documents pertaining to the case and retained and disposed of in the manner previously described.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

422.325.
Proper procedure for obtaining records required.

No institution or person shall be held in contempt or otherwise penalized for failure of production unless the business records of the institution indicate that the costs provided herein have been established and tendered. No sanction or remedy for contempt shall be applied against any such person or institution unless a subpoena or order expressly commanding the person’s presence has been issued by authority of the court or other body.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

422.330.
Privilege not waived.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to waive the psychiatrist-patient privilege, or to require any such privileged communications to be disclosed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 109, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

422.350.
Admissibility of photographic evidence in prosecution of offense defined in KRS Chapter 514 or 515 — Return of photographed property to owner by law enforcement agency — Exception.

In a prosecution for any offense defined in KRS Chapter 514 or 515 the court shall receive, as competent evidence, a photograph of property over which the accused is alleged to have exerted unauthorized control or to have otherwise obtained unlawfully, if the photograph:

Will serve the purpose of demonstrating the nature and identity of the property; and

Is otherwise admissible into evidence under all other rules of law governing the admissibility of photographs into evidence.

The fact that it is impractical to introduce into evidence the actual property for any reason including its size, weight, or unavailability, need not be established for the court to find a photograph of that property to be competent evidence. If a photograph is found to be competent evidence under this section, it is admissible into evidence in place of the property and to the same extent as the property itself.

A law enforcement agency that is holding as evidence property over which a person is alleged to have exerted unauthorized control or to have otherwise obtained unlawfully shall return that property to its owner if:

The property has been photographed in a manner that will serve the purpose of demonstrating the nature and identity of the property, and if these photographs are filed with or retained by the law enforcement agency in place of the property;

Receipt for the property is obtained from the owner upon delivery by the law enforcement agency;

The prosecuting attorney who is prosecuting a case that involves the property has not requested the law enforcement agency to decline requests for return of the property to its owner; and

The property may be lawfully possessed by the owner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a court may, if a motion so requesting is filed by a defendant within twenty (20) days of arrest, order the law enforcement agency to hold such property as evidence pending completion of the trial. However, the court may, for good cause, extend the time allowed for the defendant to file a motion to have the property held.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 125, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

422.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

422.110

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days, or both.

History.

1649b-4.